Utah statutes.
36-16a-101.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Election official" means the county clerk.

(2)  "Opinion question" means a nonbinding question that is submitted to all the legal voters of the state according to the procedures established in this chapter.

(3)  "Originating house" means:

(a)  the Utah House of Representatives if the resolution is a House joint resolution; or

(b)  the Utah Senate if the resolution is a Senate joint resolution.

(4)  "Regular general election" has the same meaning as provided under Section 20A-1-102.

